Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Penalties

381.990.
Penalties.

Any officer who certifies an abstract in violation of KRS

381.240

or

381.250

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense. In addition to such fine, the officer shall be liable personally and on his official bond to the person in possession of the lands, and to any and all other persons aggrieved thereby, to an action for damages sustained by such persons by reason of such certificate.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

381.690

to

381.710

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who fails to comply with the provisions of KRS

381.780

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25) for each offense. Each day that the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person or corporation who violates KRS

381.697

shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

Any person who fails to comply with any of the provisions of KRS

381.860

may be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each offense, and the county attorney and the Attorney General may prosecute the violator. In addition to the fine, the violator may be liable personally to any and all persons aggrieved by the violation and subject to an action for damages, plus court costs and plaintiffs’ attorneys’ fees.

History.

2379a-3, 2741p-4: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 282, § 1(4); 1972, ch. 284, § 3; 1988, ch. 115, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint to Establish Title by Adverse Possession, Form 303.01.